Utah statutes.
34-34-17.   Violation of act a misdemeanor.

A violation of this act shall constitute a misdemeanor, and each day such unlawful conduct, as defined in this chapter, is in effect or continued shall be deemed a separate offense and shall be punishable as such, as provided in this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 85, 1969 General Session

